Oklahoma, session 2025, SB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 803 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Not later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of
this act, the Corporation Commission shall start the process to
engage an outside consulting firm to conduct a technical and legal
feasibility study on nuclear energy generation in this state. This
engagement shall be exempt from the state procurement process under
Section 85.1 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes and follow
the Corporation Commission process to retain expert witnesses on
behalf of the agency to ensure the ability to timely conduct the
study and complete the requirements of this section. The consulting
firm shall be well-established in the nuclear industry.
B. The feasibility study shall evaluate and consider:

1. Advantages and disadvantages of generating nuclear energy in
this state, including, but not limited to, the economic and
environmental impacts;
2. Methods to maximize existing workforce and products made in
this state for the construction of nuclear energy generation
facilities;
3. Design characteristics, including recommendations for design
specification and site selection;
4. Environmental and ecological impacts;
5. Land and siting criteria, including specific geographic
areas that are best suited for new nuclear generation, as well as
cities near military bases that may use new nuclear electric
generation to meet the military resiliency requirements of 10
U.S.C., Section 2920;
6. Safety criteria;
7. Engineering and cost-related information;
8. Small modular nuclear reactor and microreactors capability;
and
9. Socioeconomic factors, including, but not limited to:
a. workforce education, training, and development,
b. local and state tax base,
c. supply chain capability,
d. permanent and temporary job creation,
e. timeline for development, including areas of potential
efficiencies, and potential leveraging of existing
facilities within this state,
f. literature review of studies that have assessed the
potential impact of nuclear energy generation, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 130 Page 2

g. policy recommendations to support nuclear energy
generation, including a survey of federal programs to
financially assist the development of a nuclear
project in this state.
C. The Corporation Commission in conjunction with retail
electric suppliers and municipally owned electric utilities shall
cooperate in providing information relevant to the feasibility
study, providing for reasonable safeguards to protect confidential
information.
D. Not later than nine (9) months after the effective date of
this act, the Corporation Commission shall electronically deliver
the feasibility study findings to the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, and the Governor.
E. In the event the Corporation Commission is unable to hire a
consultant to complete the report, the Commission is authorized to
conduct a notice of inquiry and utilize the information received
from the stakeholders in conjunction with a consulting firm to
reduce the cost of gathering information for the purpose of the
study and report.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 130 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 27th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 130 Page 4